Oklahoma, session 2025, SB937.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3105A.1 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Uniform Health


Care Decisions Act of 2025”.

Req. No. 329 Page 1


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3105A.2 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. An individual has capacity for the purpose of this act if


the individual:


1. Is willing and able to communicate a decision independently


or with appropriate services, technological assistance, supported


decision-making, or other reasonable accommodation; and


2. In making or revoking:


a. a health care decision, understands the nature and


consequences of the decision, including the primary


risks and benefits of the decision,


b. a health care instruction, understands the nature and


consequences of the instruction, including the primary


risks and benefits of the choices expressed in the


instruction, and


c. an appointment of an agent under a health care power


of attorney or identification of a default surrogate,


recognizes the identity of the individual being


appointed or identified and understands the general


nature of the relationship of the individual making


the appointment or identification with the individual


being appointed or identified.



Req. No. 329 Page 2


B. The right of an individual who has capacity to make a


decision about the individual’s health care is not affected by


whether the individual creates or revokes an advance health care


directive.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3105A.3 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. An individual is presumed to have capacity to make or revoke


a health care decision, health care instruction, and power of


attorney for health care unless:


1. A court has found the individual lacks capacity to do so; or


2. The presumption is rebutted under subsection B of this


section.


B. Subject to the provisions of this act, a presumption under


subsection A of this section may be rebutted by a finding that the


individual lacks capacity:


1. Subject to subsection C of this section, made on the basis


of a contemporaneous examination by any of the following:


a. a physician,


b. a psychologist licensed or otherwise authorized to


practice in this state,


c. an individual with training and expertise in the


finding of lack of capacity who is licensed or


otherwise authorized to practice in this state as:

Req. No. 329 Page 3


(1) a physician assistant,


(2) an Advanced Practice Registered Nurse, or


(3) a social worker, or


d. a responsible health care professional not described


in subparagraph a, b, or c of this paragraph if:


(1) the individual about whom the finding is to be


made is experiencing a health condition requiring


a decision regarding health care treatment to be


made promptly to avoid loss of life or serious


harm to the health of the individual, and


(2) an individual listed in subparagraph a, b, or c


of this paragraph is not reasonably available;


2. Made in accordance with accepted standards of the profession


and the scope of practice of the individual making the finding and


to a reasonable degree of certainty; and


3. Documented in a record signed by the individual making the


finding that includes an opinion of the cause, nature, extent, and


probable duration of the lack of capacity.


C. The finding under subsection B of this section may not be


made by:


1. A family member of the individual presumed to have capacity;


2. The cohabitant of the individual or a descendant of the


cohabitant; or



Req. No. 329 Page 4


3. The individual’s surrogate, a family member of the


surrogate, or a descendant of the surrogate.


D. If the finding under subsection B of this section was based


on a condition the individual no longer has, or a responsible health


care professional subsequently has good cause to believe the


individual has capacity, the individual is presumed to have capacity


unless a court finds the individual lacks capacity or the


presumption is rebutted under subsection B of this section.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3105A.4 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. An individual may create a health care instruction that


expresses the individual’s preferences for future health care,


including preferences regarding:


1. Health care professionals or health care institutions;


2. How a health care decision will be made and communicated;


3. Persons that should or should not be consulted regarding a


health care decision;


4. A person to serve as guardian for the individual if one is


appointed; and


5. An individual to serve as a default surrogate.


B. A health care professional to whom an individual


communicates or provides an instruction under subsection A of this


section shall document the instruction and the date of the

Req. No. 329 Page 5


instruction in the individual’s medical record or communicate the


instruction and date of the instruction to an administrator with


responsibility for medical records of the health care institution


providing health care to the individual, who shall document the


instruction and the date of the instruction in the individual’s


medical record.


C. A health care instruction made by an individual that


conflicts with an earlier health care instruction made by the


individual, including an instruction documented in a medical order,


revokes the earlier instruction to the extent of the conflict.


D. A health care instruction may be in the same record as a


power of attorney for health care.


SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3105A.5 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. An individual may create a power of attorney for health care


to appoint an agent to make health care decisions for the


individual.


B. An individual is disqualified from acting as agent for an


individual who lacks capacity to make health care decisions if:


1. A court finds that the potential agent poses a danger to the


individual’s well-being, even if the court does not issue a


restraining order against the potential agent; or



Req. No. 329 Page 6


2. The potential agent is an owner, operator, employee, or


contractor of a nursing home or other residential care facility in


which the individual resides or is receiving care, unless the owner,


operator, employee, or contractor is a family member of the


individual, the cohabitant of the individual, or a descendant of the


cohabitant.


C. A health care decision made by an agent is effective without


judicial approval.


D. A power of attorney for health care must be in a record,


signed by the individual creating the power, and signed by an adult


witness who:


1. Reasonably believes the act of the individual to create the


power of attorney is voluntary and knowing;


2. Is not:


a. the agent appointed by the individual,


b. the agent’s spouse, domestic partner, or cohabitant,


or


c. if the individual resides or is receiving care in a


nursing home or other residential care facility, the


owner, operator, employee, or contractor of the


nursing home or other residential care facility; and


3. Is present when the individual signs the power of attorney


or when the individual represents that the power of attorney


reflects the individual’s wishes.

Req. No. 329 Page 7


E. A witness under subsection D of this section is considered


present if the witness and the individual are:


1. Physically present in the same location;


2. Using electronic means that allow for real-time audio and


visual transmission and communication in real time to the same


extent as if the witness and the individual were physically present


in the same location; or


3. Able to speak to and hear each other in real time through


audio connection if:


a. the identity of the individual is personally known to


the witness, or


b. the witness is able to authenticate the identity of


the individual by receiving accurate answers from the


individual that enable the authentication.


F. A power of attorney for health care may include a health


care instruction.


SECTION 6. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-329 DC 1/19/2025 5:46:20 AM











Req. No. 329 Page 8